Tennessee, session 114, HB0058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 38-8-106, is amended by deleting
subdivision (8) and substituting:
(8) Have a good moral character as determined by a thorough investigation
conducted by the employing agency. If the person has prior law enforcement
experience, then the employing agency shall contact any prior law enforcement agency
that employed the person as part of the thorough investigation; and
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0058
000740
- 1 -